Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB72.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Debar." Action taken by the secretary to prohibit a 12345678910111213141516171819202122 contractor, subcontractor or person from contracting for or participating in contracts for public work projects and other State procurement contracts for a specified period not to exceed three years for the first offense and five years for a second or subsequent offense. The debarment: (1) Shall cover future projects and contracts and current projects and contracts entered into but on which the debarred contractor, subcontractor or person's work has not begun as of the effective date of the debarment.(2) Shall include all divisions or other organizational elements of a contractor or subcontractor unless limited by the terms of the debarment to specific divisions or organizational elements and shall apply to any other entity or organization in which the debarred contractor, subcontractor or person has an ownership interest.(3) May apply to an affiliate or other person associated with the debarred contractor, subcontractor or person if the information received by the secretary under section 4(c)(1) or the investigation under section 4(c)(1) demonstrates that the affiliate or other person supplied labor for the construction project knowing the workers were being misclassified. The affiliate or other person must be specifically named as a party in an order to show cause under section 4 with the same procedural rights and obligations as other parties subject to an order to show cause under this act. An affiliate or other person under this paragraph shall include any owner, principal, partner or officer of the contractor, subcontractor or person, and any business entity in which the contractor, subcontractor or person has an interest as owner, principal, parent or subsidiary of the 20250SB0072PN0818 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity.* * *"Public work." The term shall have the meaning given to it in section 2(5) of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.* * *Section 2. Section 4(c)(2), (d) and (e) of the act are amended to read:Section 4. Improper classification of employees.* * *(c) Order to show cause.--* * *(2) A person served with an order to show cause shall have a period of [20] 10 days from the date the order is served to file an answer in writing.* * *(d) Enforcement.--(1) If, subsequent to issuing an order to show cause under subsection (c), the secretary finds probable cause that an employer has [committed a criminal violation of this act, the secretary shall refer the matter to the Office of Attorney General for investigation or] violated this act , the secretary shall impose administrative penalties under section 6.(2) In addition to imposing penalties under paragraph (1), the secretary may refer the matter to the Attorney General for criminal investigation. The secretary shall make a referral if the employer has previously been adjudicated to be in violation of this act. The Attorney General has jurisdiction under section 5 to initiate an investigation or 20250SB0072PN0818 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prosecution of criminal violations of this act regardless of whether a referral has been made.(e) Acting in concert with other parties.--A party that does not meet the definition of "employer" in section 2, but which [intentionally] contracts with an employer [knowing the employer intends to misclassify] to supply labor for construction knowing the employer will misclassify the supplied employees in violation of this act, shall be subject to the same penalties, remedies or other actions as the employer found to be in violation of this act.* * *Section 3. Section 5(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 5. Criminal penalties.(a) Grading.--[An employer, or officer or agent of an employer, that intentionally violates section 4(a) commits:(1) A misdemeanor of the third degree for a first offense.(2) A misdemeanor of the second degree for a second or subsequent offense.] An employer, or officer or agent of an employer, who knowingly violates section 4(a) commits:(1) A misdemeanor of the second degree if the employer has no prior offense under section 4(a).(2) A misdemeanor of the first degree if the employer has one prior offense under section 4(a).(3) A felony of the third degree if the employer has two or more prior offenses under section 4(a).* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250SB0072PN0818 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Prior offense." A conviction of a violation of section 4, if the judgment of sentence was imposed before the defendant is sentenced for a separate violation of section 4.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Private right of action.(a) Commencement.--An employee who has been misclassified in violation of this act, or has been discharged, threatened or has otherwise suffered retaliation, discrimination or other adverse action as a result of participating in an investigation or reporting a violation of this act may bring a private right of action in a court of common pleas in accordance with established civil procedures of this Commonwealth.(b) Time.--The action must be brought within three years from the date that the employee knew of the violation, retaliation or discrimination.(c) Relief.--If an employee prevails in an action commenced under this section, the employee shall be entitled to the following relief:(1) Reinstatement of the employee without a loss in seniority status, if applicable.(2) Restitution equal to three times the amount of the employee's wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the violation, retaliation or discrimination.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action.(4) Other legal and equitable relief the court deems appropriate to make the employee whole.Section 5. Sections 6(a) and 10(a) of the act are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 6. Administrative penalties.20250SB0072PN0818 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--When the secretary finds that a person has violated this act, the secretary [may assess]:(1) Shall assess and collect [civil] administrative penalties of not more than $1,000 for the first violation, and not more than $2,500 for each subsequent violation.(2) May order a financial audit or tax audit of the person.* * *(c) Intentional violation.--If the secretary determines that a violation of this act was intentional, the secretary shall debar the employer. Section 10. Retaliation for action prohibited.(a) General rule.--It shall be unlawful for an employer, or officer or agent of an employer, to [discriminate in any manner or take adverse action against any person in retaliation for exercising rights protected under this act. Rights protected under this act include, but are not limited to, the right to file a complaint or inform any person about an employer's noncompliance with this act.] discharge, threaten or otherwise retaliate or discriminate in any manner against an employee regarding compensation or other terms or conditions of employment because the employee:(1) participates in an investigation, hearing or inquiry by the secretary or any governmental authority; or(2) reports or makes a complaint regarding the violation of this act to a construction industry employer or any governmental authority.(a.1) Action.--An employee who suffers retaliation or discrimination in violation of this section may bring a private right of action under section 5.1.20250SB0072PN0818 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 6. Sections 11, 12 and 17 of the act are amended to read:Section 11. Availability of information.The department shall create a poster [for job sites] which outlines the requirements and penalties under this act and shall make the poster available on its Internet website. Every employer subject to this act shall keep a summary of this act and any regulations issued under this act applicable to the employer, posted in a conspicuous place where employees normally pass and can read it, both on job sites and in all places of business. At the discretion of the secretary, a toll-free hotline telephone number may be established to receive alleged violations.Section 12. Use of penalty funds.[Any sum collected as a penalty under:(1) Sections 6, 7 and 9 for a violation of section 4(a)(1) shall be paid into the Workers' Compensation Administration Fund.(2) Sections 6, 7 and 9 for a violation of section 4(a)(2) shall be paid into the Special Administration Fund created under section 601.1 of the Unemployment Compensation Law.(3) Section 9 for a violation of any other provision of this act shall be divided equally between the Workers' Compensation Administration Fund and the Special Administration Fund.] Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any sum collected as a penalty, recovered attorney fees or costs associated with investigation and enforcement actions shall be deposited into 20250SB0072PN0818 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a restricted revenue account in the General Fund to be used for future enforcement of this act.Section 17. Funding.(a) Enforcement.--The department shall not be required to enforce this act until adequate funding is appropriated.(b) Recovery of fees and costs.--The department, Office of Attorney General or a district attorney's office shall be entitled to recover attorney fees and costs associated with the investigation of construction worker misclassification from employers who violate the provisions of this act.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0072PN0818 - 8 - 1234567891011